Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.02
Department of Administrative Services Revolving Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Department of Administrative Services Revolving Fund. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Administrative Services. The fund shall consist of assessments against each division within the department and miscellaneous fees for services provided by the department. The money in the fund shall be used to defray the administrative expenses incurred by the department.

Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 116.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.